Florida, session 2026, HB1367.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 760.11,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
760.11 Administrative and civil remedies; construction.—
(1) Any person aggrieved by a violation of ss. 760.01-
760.10 may file a complaint with the commission within 365 days
after of the alleged violation, naming the employer, employment
agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee,
or, in the case of an alleged violation of s. 760.10(5), the
person responsible for the violation and describing the
violation. Any person aggrieved by a violation of s. 509.092 may
file a complaint with the commission within 365 days after of
the alleged violation, naming the person responsible for the
violation and describing the violation. The commission, a
commissioner, or the Attorney General may in like manner file
such a complaint. On the same day the complaint is filed with
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1367-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1367 2026
the commission, the commission shall clearly stamp on the face
of the complaint the date the complaint was filed with the
commission. In lieu of filing the complaint with the commission,
a complaint under this section may be filed with the federal
Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or with any unit of
government of the state which is a fair-employment-practice
agency under 29 C.F.R. ss. 1601.70-1601.80. If the date the
complaint is filed is clearly stamped on the face of the
complaint, that date is the date of filing. The date the
complaint is filed with the commission for purposes of this
section is the earliest date of filing with the Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission, the fair-employment-practice agency, or
the commission. The complaint must shall contain a short and
plain statement of the facts describing the violation and the
relief sought. The commission may require additional information
to be in the complaint. The commission, within 5 days after of
the complaint being filed, shall by registered mail send a copy
of the complaint to the person who allegedly committed the
violation. The person who allegedly committed the violation may
file an answer to the complaint within 25 days after of the date
the complaint was filed with the commission. Any answer filed
must shall be mailed to the aggrieved person by the person
filing the answer. Both the complaint and the answer must shall
be verified.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2), the commission
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1367-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1367 2026
shall investigate the allegations in the complaint. Within 180
days after of the filing of the complaint, the commission shall
determine whether if there is reasonable cause to believe that
discriminatory practice has occurred in violation of the Florida
Civil Rights Act of 1992. When the commission determines whether
or not there is reasonable cause, the commission by registered
mail shall promptly notify the aggrieved person and the
respondent of the reasonable cause determination, the date of
such determination, and the options available under this
section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.

Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1367-00